Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1810
Related operating expenses, defined.

Related operating expenses means any necessary operating expenses of a project or system required to be paid from the mandated project charge by an order of a court pursuant to 11 U.S.C. 928(b), as such section existed on January 1, 2006.

Laws 2006, LB 548, § 10.